Georgia, session 2025_26, HB683.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 8-2-4 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to certain residential
fire sprinkler requirements prohibited, is amended as follows:
"8-2-4.
As of May 24, 2010, the state residential and fire building code shall not include a
requirement that fire sprinklers be installed in a single-family or residential building that
contains no more than two dwelling units. Nothing in this Code section shall preclude any
residential fire and building code adopted by any political subdivision of the state from
adopting a local fire sprinkler ordinance requiring fire sprinklers in one- and two-family
H. B. 683
- 1 -

LC 46 1176
dwellings. Neither the state residential and fire building code nor any residential and fire
building code adopted by a political subdivision of the state adopted after May 24, 2010,
shall include a requirement that fire sprinklers be installed in a single-family dwelling or
a residential building that contains no more than two dwelling units."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 683
- 2 -